Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1014.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) The health insurance affordability board has a responsibility
to prioritize documented Colorado residents when evaluating how to
allocate the revenue within its cash fund;
(b) Programs such as the OmniSalud program have limited the
ability of other programs within the Colorado health insurance
affordability enterprise to maximize their impact on documented
Coloradans' health insurance costs; and
(c) The health insurance affordability fee and the revenue it
creates need to be allocated to demonstrate responsible fiscal spending by
the Colorado health insurance affordability enterprise.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that:
(a) The health insurance affordability board needs to evaluate and
prioritize programs that have a direct impact on our most vulnerable
communities, allocating additional funding to programs that have had a
clear, direct impact on Coloradans; and
(b) By directing money to documented residents, the state
demonstrates its commitment to tax-paying Coloradans and to protecting
those Coloradans who are at risk of losing their current health coverage
-2- HB25B-1014

plans.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1205, amend
(2)(d)(I) introductory portion; and add (2)(e) as follows:
10-16-1205. Health insurance affordability fee - special
assessment on hospitals - allocation of revenues - report -
presentation. (2) (d) (I) The enterprise shall allocate the revenues
collected in 2023 and each year thereafter THROUGH JUNE 30, 2026, and
any other money deposited in the fund in 2023 and each year thereafter
THROUGH JUNE 30, 2026, in the following amounts and order of priority:
(e) (I) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ALLOCATE THE REVENUES
COLLECTED ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2026, AND ANY OTHER MONEY
DEPOSITED IN THE FUND ON AND AFTER JULY1, 2026, AS DETERMINED BY
THE BOARD. IN ITS DETERMINATION OF THE ALLOCATION OF MONEY
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2)(e), THE BOARD SHALL:
(A) PRIORITIZE THE FACILITATION OF REDUCING HEALTH
COVERAGE PLAN PREMIUM INCREASES AND AVOIDING THE LOSS OF HEALTH
COVERAGE PLANS FOR INDIVIDUALS IN THE INDIVIDUAL MARKET AND
INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE UNABLE TO PURCHASE HEALTH COVERAGE PLANS
THROUGH THE EXCHANGE;
(B) EVALUATE THE CURRENT COSTS OF THE STATE-SUBSIDIZED
INDIVIDUAL HEALTH COVERAGE PLANS PURCHASED BY QUALIFIED
INDIVIDUALS, COMPARE THE CURRENT COSTS TO THE INITIAL COST
ESTIMATES, AND PRIORITIZE THE REDUCTION OF THE HEALTH COVERAGE
PLAN PREMIUMS FOR DOCUMENTED RESIDENTS; AND
(C) ON THE DIVISION'S WEBSITE, PUBLISH A REPORT OF THE
ESTIMATED AND ACTUAL COSTS OF EACH STATE-SUBSIDIZED INDIVIDUAL
HEALTH COVERAGE PLAN EVALUATED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
-3- HB25B-1014

(2)(e)(I)(B) OF THIS SECTION AND THE REQUIRED ALLOCATION OF MONEY
IN THE FUND AS DETERMINED BY THE BOARD RESULTING FROM THE
EVALUATIONS AND COST COMPARISONS.
(II) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL PRESENT THE EVALUATIONS, COST
COMPARISONS, AND ALLOCATION OF MONEY FROM THE FUND TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY AS PART OF THE DIVISION'S "SMART ACT"
PRESENTATION REQUIRED BY SECTION 2-7-203 PRIOR TO OR DURING THE
2027 LEGISLATIVE SESSION.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly; except
that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V
of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this
act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take
effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- HB25B-1014